Georgia, session 2025_26, HB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to educational programs under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended by
H. B. 294
- 1 -

LC 49 1958
revising Code Section 20-2-159.4, relating to policies and guidelines for awarding units of
high school credit based on demonstrated proficiency, as follows:
"20-2-159.4.
(a) By August 1, 2025, the The State Board of Education, in consultation with the Board
of Regents of the University System of Georgia and the State Board of the Technical
College System of Georgia, shall adopt review and update, as necessary, policies and
establish guidelines for awarding units of high school credit to students based on a
demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completion
of courses of classroom instruction. Such policies and guidelines shall clearly delineate the
manner in which students can earn credit, how mastery of standards will be assessed, how
locally developed assessments will be reviewed and approved, how such credit will be
recorded on high school transcripts, and when outcomes as a result of these policies and
guidelines will be reviewed. The state board shall adopt such policies and establish
guidelines, and such policies and guidelines shall be applicable beginning with the
2013-2014 2025-2026 school year.
(b) Students may earn credits through:
(1) The completion of courses; or
(2) The testing out or otherwise demonstrating mastery of the course content.
(c) The state board shall identify assessments, including various commercial assessments,
for immediate use for students to demonstrate subject area competency, which may
include, but not be limited to:
(1) Advanced placement exams;
(2) ACT course assessment;
(3) Industry-specific certificates and industry credentialing, as defined in Code Section
20-2-326, for career, technical, and agricultural education courses;
(4) College Level Examination Program (CLEP) exams; and
(5) Nationally recognized foreign language performance assessments; and
H. B. 294
- 2 -

LC 49 1958
(6) International baccalaureate exams administered in conjunction with the completion
of an international baccalaureate diploma program.
(d) The state board shall establish a process for reviewing and approving performance
based assessments developed commercially, by the state, or by a local school system.
Initially, the state board shall limit the number of credits earned though such educational
options to three credits per student until the practice is proven to yield student outcomes
at least equivalent to those found in standard seat-time courses. The policy shall ensure
that credit for demonstrated proficiency is reported on student transcripts in the same way
that seat-time credit is recorded. The state board shall review such policy after three years
to determine if student outcomes from these educational options are equivalent to, if not
better than, student outcomes in traditional courses.
(e) No policy, guideline, and process established by the state board pursuant to this Code
section shall authorize the State School Superintendent to deny, delay, or otherwise
interfere with the approval of any performance based assessment identified and approved
by the state board pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section.
(d)(f) Each local school system shall comply with the state board's plan policies,
guidelines, and processes adopted pursuant to this Code section and shall award units of
high school credit in accordance with such plan policies, guidelines, and processes. Local
boards of education and charter schools other public school governing bodies shall
establish implementation policies and shall be prohibited from setting policies that negate
or otherwise prohibit access to such plan impede compliance with such policies, guidelines,
and processes.
(g) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require any local school system or
public school to include any advanced placement or international baccalaureate course
among the courses that are available to students enrolled in such local school system or
public school."
H. B. 294
- 3 -

LC 49 1958
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 294
- 4 -